District of Columbia statutes.
16-4511

Repealed

Appearance of parties and the child.

Repealed.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-200, § 2, 30 DCR 125
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(c), 48 DCR 2214
1981 Ed., § 16-4511.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 11 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act.